Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 11

Miscellaneous Provisions

35-15-1101. No consideration given to need to promote uniformity of application and construction of law.

Numerous provisions of each of the following have been modified extensively relative to their respective uniform acts as such uniform acts were drafted and have been amended by the Uniform Law Commission, also known as the National Conference of Commissioners of Uniform State Laws:

Chapter 6, the Uniform Principal and Income Act;

Chapter 14, the Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002; and

Chapter 15, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

These modifications were undertaken deliberately and after significant consideration:

Therefore, in applying and construing title 35, no consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states, including any other state that has enacted laws covering the same general subject matter as chapters 9, 14 or 15, either by enacting such respective uniform acts as such uniform acts were originally drafted or as such were originally drafted and subsequently have been amended, or by enacting laws based on or similar to such uniform acts as originally drafted or as such have been amended; and

Unless specifically provided otherwise in this chapter, chapter 6 or chapter 14, courts shall not consult, rely on or give any persuasive value to such uniform acts or any respective other state's acts based on or similar to such uniform acts, or any comments accompanying any such uniform acts or any respective other state's acts based on or similar to such uniform acts; none of which have any force or effect relative to trusts governed by the laws of this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 90; 2013, ch. 390, § 42.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

General Comment.

With the exception of the provision for electronic records and signatures and the provision covering application of the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code existing relationships (i.e., effective date provisions), T.C.A. §§ 35-15-1101 – 35-15-1105 diverge entirely from article 11 of the Uniform Trust Code.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-15-1102. Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7002), and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 91.

35-15-1103. Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on July 1, 2004:

This chapter applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2004;

This chapter applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2004;

This chapter applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2004, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2004, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2004, is not affected by this chapter.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2004, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 94.

35-15-1104. Alter ego.

Absent clear and convincing evidence, no settlor of an irrevocable trust may be deemed to be the alter ego of a trustee of such trust.

None of the following factors, by themselves or in combination, may be considered sufficient evidence for a court to conclude that the settlor controls a trustee, or is the alter ego of a trustee of such trust:

Any combination of the factors listed in § 35-15-1105 regarding dominion and control over a trust;

Isolated occurrences where the settlor has signed checks, made disbursements, or executed other documents related to such trust as a trustee, a trust advisor or a trust protector, when in fact the settlor was not such a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector;

Making any requests for distributions on behalf of beneficiaries; or

Making any requests to the trustee to hold, purchase, or sell any trust property.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 52 provided that: (a) Absent clear and convincing evidence, no settlor of an irrevocable trust may be deemed to be the alter ego of a trustee of such trust.”

None of the following factors, by themselves or in combination, may be considered sufficient evidence for a court to conclude that the settlor controls a trustee, or is the alter ego of a trustee of such trust:

Any combination of the factors listed in § 35-15-1105 regarding dominion and control over a trust;

Isolated occurrences where the settlor has signed checks, made disbursements, or executed other documents related to such trust as a trustee, a trust advisor or a trust protector, when in fact the settlor was not such a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector;

Making any requests for distributions on behalf of beneficiaries; or

Making any requests to the trustee to hold, purchase, or sell any trust property.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-1104.

The Uniform Trust Code has no similar provision to this section.

Deeming that a settlor of a trust is the alter ego of the trustee of such trust can cause multiple significant issues, including but not limited to taxation, as well as a trust’s level of spendthrift and discretionary trust protection and the effect of exercising discretion in general. Therefore, in keeping with the Tennessee trust statutes’ emphasis on freedom of disposition and settlor’s intent, this section makes it exceedingly difficult for a settlor of a trust to be deemed an alter ego of the trustee of such trust.

35-15-1105. Dominion and control over a trust.

In the event a person challenges a settlor's or a beneficiary's influence over a trust, none of the following factors, alone or in combination, shall enter into a determination that dominion and control over a trust exists:

The settlor or a beneficiary is serving as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary as described in § 35-15-508;

The settlor or a beneficiary holds an unrestricted power to remove or replace a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary;

The settlor or a beneficiary is a trust administrator, a general partner of a partnership, a manager of a limited liability company, an officer of a corporation, or holds any other managerial function relative to any type of entity specified in this subdivision (3), or relative to any other type of entity not so specified, and part or all of the trust property consists of an interest in such entity;

A person related by blood or adoption to the settlor or a beneficiary is appointed as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary;

The settlor's or a beneficiary's agent, accountant, attorney, financial advisor, or friend is appointed as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary;

A business associate is appointed as a trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary;

A beneficiary holds any power of appointment over any or all of the trust property;

The settlor holds a power to substitute property of equivalent value for property held by the trust, regardless of whether such power is:

Held in a fiduciary or nonfiduciary capacity;

Exercisable with or without the approval of any person in a fiduciary capacity; or

Exercisable with or without the approval of any person having an interest adverse to such settlor;

A trustee, a trust advisor, a trust protector or other fiduciary has the power to loan trust property to the settlor for less than a full and adequate rate of interest or without adequate security;

Any language relative to the power to make any distribution provides for any discretion relative to such distribution;

The trust has only one beneficiary eligible for current distributions; or

The beneficiary is serving as a cotrustee, or as a trust advisor or trust protector under part 12, or as any other fiduciary.

Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 52 provided that: (a) Absent clear and convincing evidence, no settlor of an irrevocable trust may be deemed to be the alter ego of a trustee of such trust.”

None of the following factors, by themselves or in combination, may be considered sufficient evidence for a court to conclude that the settlor controls a trustee, or is the alter ego of a trustee of such trust:

Any combination of the factors listed in § 35-15-1105 regarding dominion and control over a trust;

Isolated occurrences where the settlor has signed checks, made disbursements, or executed other documents related to such trust as a trustee, a trust advisor or a trust protector, when in fact the settlor was not such a trustee, trust advisor or trust protector;

Making any requests for distributions on behalf of beneficiaries; or

Making any requests to the trustee to hold, purchase, or sell any trust property.

Section Comment.

Unless provided otherwise hereinafter, any reference to “section,” “subsection” or “subdivision” means all, or such portion of, T.C.A. § 35-15-1105.

The Uniform Trust Code has no similar provision to this section.

A finding that the influence of a settlor or a beneficiary of a trust rises to the level of dominion and control over such trust can cause multiple significant issues, including but not limited to taxation, as well as a trust’s level of spendthrift and discretionary trust protection and the effect of exercising discretion in general. Therefore, in keeping with the Tennessee trust statutes’ emphasis on freedom of disposition and settlor’s intent, this section makes it exceedingly difficult to sustain that the a settlor’s or beneficiary’s influence over a trust gives either such person dominion and control over such trust.